Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 7. Trial of Property Rights in Property Seized on Execution or
Attachment

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

30 Am. Jur. 2d Executions and Enforcement of Judgments §§ 136 to 146.

§ 1-21-701.
Notice
and time of trial.

When an officer levies
on property claimed by any person other than the party against whom
the execution issued, the claimant shall give three (3) days notice
of objection in writing to the plaintiff or his agent. If the plaintiff
or his agent cannot be found within the county, the notice shall be
served by leaving a copy at his usual place of abode in the county,
or if no place of abode exists then by leaving notice at the court,
stating the time and place of trial to determine the right to the
property. The trial shall be held before a circuit court in the county
at least one (1) day prior to the time appointed for sale of the property.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 122; R.S. 1887, § 3538; R.S. 1899, § 4449; C.S. 1910, § 5312; C.S. 1920, § 6584; R.S. 1931, § 62-1901; C.S. 1945, § 14-1301; W.S. 1957, § 1-661; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-701; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 2; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court in” for “justice of.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Intervener's question. —

Claimant to attached automobile having intervened and introduced evidence in action without objection, court was authorized to decide question raised by intervener's motion. Steffy v. Teton Truck Line Co., 44 Wyo. 345, 11 P.2d 1082,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1932).

§ 1-21-702.
Judgment for claimant; restoration of property.

If on trial the court
or jury is satisfied that the property or any part belongs to the
claimant the court shall render judgment against the party in whose
favor the execution issued, including costs. The court shall give
a written order to the officer who levied on or is charged with selling
the property, directing him to restore the property found to belong
to the claimant.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 123; R.S. 1887, § 3539; R.S. 1899, § 4450; C.S. 1910, § 5313; C.S. 1920, § 6585; R.S. 1931, § 62-1902; C.S. 1945, § 14-1302; W.S. 1957, § 1-662; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-702; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 2.

Intervener's question. —

Claimant to attached automobile having intervened and introduced evidence in action without objection, court was authorized to decide question raised by intervener's motion. Steffy v. Teton Truck Line Co., 44 Wyo. 345, 11 P.2d 1082,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1932).

§ 1-21-703.
Judgment against claimant.

If the claimant fails
to establish his right to the property or any part thereof, the judge
shall render judgment against the claimant for costs accrued on account
of the trial and issue execution therefor. The officer is not liable
to the claimant for the property so taken.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 124; R.S. 1887, § 3540; R.S. 1899, § 4451; C.S. 1910, § 5314; C.S. 1920, § 6586; R.S. 1931, § 62-1903; C.S. 1945, § 14-1303; W.S. 1957, § 1-663; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-703; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “judge” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Intervener's question. —

Claimant to attached automobile having intervened and introduced evidence in action without objection, court was authorized to decide question raised by intervener's motion. Steffy v. Teton Truck Line Co., 44 Wyo. 345, 11 P.2d 1082,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1932).